Nebraska, session 109, LB23.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB23 LB23
2025 2025
Section 1. The Department of Economic Development shall establish a
program for awarding grants to nonprofit organizations to operate bike-
sharing programs. The department shall provide grants to nonprofit
organizations it deems eligible. The department shall require reporting
by such nonprofit organizations to verify the grant was used for the
intended purpose. The department shall provide a process for the return
of funds not used as authorized. It is the intent of the Legislature to
appropriate two hundred fifty thousand dollars from the General Fund to
the department to establish this program.
-2-